North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-06 Department of Human Services

50-06-01.
Definitions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Behavioral health” means the planning and implementation of preventive, consultative, diagnostic, treatment, crisis intervention, rehabilitative, and suicide prevention services for individuals with mental, emotional, or substance use disorders, and psychiatric conditions.

“Behavioral health provider” means any licensed or accredited behavioral health provider in this state.

“Department” means the department of human services.

“Human services” means:

A service or assistance provided to an individual or an individual’s family in need of services or assistance, including child welfare services, economic assistance programs, medical services programs, and aging services programs, to assist the individual or the individual’s family in achieving and maintaining basic self-sufficiency, including physical health, mental health, education, welfare, food and nutrition, and housing.

A service or assistance provided, administered, or supervised by the department in accordance with chapter 50-06.

Licensing duties as administered or supervised by the department or delegated by the department to a human service zone.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 221, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 50-0601; S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 19; 1989, ch. 575, § 1; 1995, ch. 457, § 1; 2017, ch. 353, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 78, effective January 1, 2020; 2019, ch. 392, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

Section 50-06-01 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 78 of Chapter 391, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2124; and Section 2 of Chapter 392, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2198.

50-06-01.
Definition. [Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Behavioral health” means the planning and implementation of preventive, consultative, diagnostic, treatment, crisis intervention, rehabilitative, and suicide prevention services for individuals with mental, emotional, or substance use disorders, and psychiatric conditions.

“Behavioral health provider” means any licensed or accredited behavioral health provider in this state.

“Department” means the department of health and human services.

“Human services” means:

A service or assistance provided to an individual or an individual’s family in need of services or assistance, including child welfare services, economic assistance programs, medical services programs, and aging services programs, to assist the individual or the individual’s family in achieving and maintaining basic self-sufficiency, including physical health, mental health, education, welfare, food and nutrition, and housing.

A service or assistance provided, administered, or supervised by the department in accordance with chapter 50-06.

Licensing duties as administered or supervised by the department or delegated by the department to a human service zone.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 221, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 50-0601; S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 19; 1989, ch. 575, § 1; 1995, ch. 457, § 1; 2017, ch. 353, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 78, effective January 1, 2020; 2019, ch. 392, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 381, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-01.1.
Department of human services to be substituted for public welfare board of North Dakota and social service board of North Dakota, members of board, and executive director. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

When the terms “public welfare board of North Dakota”, “social service board of North Dakota”, “executive director of the public welfare board”, “executive director of the social service board”, “member of the public welfare board”, or “member of the social service board”, or any derivative of those terms which, when used in context indicates an intention to refer to those persons or that board, appear in the North Dakota Century Code, the term “department of human services”, or the term “executive director of the department of human services”, as the case may be, must be substituted therefor. It is the intent of the legislative assembly that the department of human services must be substituted for, shall take any action previously to be taken by, and shall perform any duties previously to be performed by the public welfare board of North Dakota or by the social service board of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 465, § 1; 1981, ch. 486, § 20.

50-06-01.1.
Department of health and human services to be substituted for public welfare board of North Dakota and social service board of North Dakota, members of board, executive director, and department of human services. [Effective September 1, 2022]

When the terms “public welfare board of North Dakota”, “social service board of North Dakota”, “executive director of the public welfare board”, “executive director of the social service board”, “department of human services”, or “executive director of the department of human services”, “member of the public welfare board”, or “member of the social service board”, or any derivative of those terms which, when used in context indicates an intention to refer to those persons or that board, appear in the North Dakota Century Code, the term “department of health and human services”, or the term “executive director of the department of health and human services”, as the case may be, must be substituted therefor. It is the intent of the legislative assembly that the department of health and human services must be substituted for, shall take any action previously to be taken by, and shall perform any duties previously to be performed by the public welfare board of North Dakota, by the social service board of North Dakota, by the department of human services, or by the state department of health. The legislative council may replace references to the “department of human services” or “executive director of the department of human services” or any derivatives of those terms with “department of health and human services” or “executive director of the department of health and human services” in any measure enacted by the sixty-seventh legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 465, § 1; 1981, ch. 486, § 20; 2021, ch. 352, § 382, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-01.2.
Department of human services — Creation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 1; 1991, ch. 508, § 2; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1999, ch. 422, § 1; 2007, ch. 39, § 19; repealed by 2017, ch. 353, § 10, effective August 1, 2017.

50-06-01.3.
Appointment of executive director — Compensation.

The governor shall appoint the executive director of the department who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The executive director shall take the oath of office required of civil officers by section 44-01-05. The executive director is entitled to receive compensation in the amount established by the governor within the limits of legislative appropriations.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 2; 1989, ch. 69, § 53; 1989, ch. 575, § 2; 1995, ch. 457, § 2.

50-06-01.4.
Structure of the department. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department includes the state hospital, the regional human service centers, a vocational rehabilitation unit, and other units or offices and administrative and fiscal support services as the executive director determines necessary. The department must be structured to promote efficient and effective operations and, consistent with fulfilling its prescribed statutory duties, shall act as the official agency of the state in the discharge of the following functions not otherwise by law made the responsibility of another state agency:

Administration of programs for children and families, including adoption services and the licensure of child-placing agencies, foster care services and the licensure of foster care arrangements, certification of shelter care services, child protection services, children’s trust fund, licensure of early childhood programs, refugee services, in-home community-based services, quality control, and administration of the interstate compacts on the placement of children and juveniles.

Administration of programs for individuals with developmental disabilities, including licensure of facilities and services, and the design and implementation of a community-based service system for persons in need of habilitation.

Administration of aging service programs, including nutrition, transportation, advocacy, social, ombudsman, recreation, and related services funded under the Older Americans Act of 1965 [42 U.S.C. 3001 et seq.], home and community-based services, licensure of adult foster care homes, and the committee on aging.

Administration of behavioral health programs, including:

A policy division responsible for reviewing and identifying service needs and activities in the state’s behavioral health system in an effort to ensure health and safety, access to services, and quality of services; establishing quality assurance standards for the licensure of substance use disorder program services and facilities; and providing policy leadership in partnership with public and private entities; and

A service delivery division responsible for providing chronic disease management, regional intervention services, and twenty-four-hour crisis services for individuals with behavioral health disorders.

Administration of economic assistance programs, including temporary assistance for needy families, the supplemental nutrition assistance program, home energy assistance, child care assistance, refugee assistance, work experience, work incentive, and quality control.

Administration of medical service programs, including medical assistance for children’s health insurance program, Medicaid waivers, early and periodic screening, diagnosis and treatment, utilization control, autism services, and claims processing.

Administration of general assistance.

Administration of child support.

The executive director shall consult with and maintain a close working relationship with the state department of health; with the department of corrections and rehabilitation and the superintendents of the school for the deaf and the North Dakota vision services-school for the blind to develop programs for individuals with developmental disabilities; and with the superintendent of public instruction to maximize the use of resource persons in regional human service centers in the provision of special education services. The executive director shall also maintain a close liaison with human service zones.

By August 1, 2019, the department shall establish a template for the development of human service zone plans, including process and content requirements, access point expectations, client grievances procedures, human resources, and locally funded programs or services and how those services will be addressed.

The department shall develop, with assistance from the North Dakota association of counties, a process for consultation and technical assistance for human service zone working groups by August 1, 2019.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 3; 1985, ch. 311, § 11; 1985, ch. 521, § 3; 1987, ch. 570, § 18; 1989, ch. 317, § 4; 1991, ch. 508, § 3; 1991, ch. 592, § 25; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1995, ch. 458, § 2; 1997, ch. 404, § 50; 2007, ch. 39, § 20; 2013, ch. 367, § 4; 2015, ch. 200, § 31, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 331, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 332, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 353, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 79, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 352, § 383, effective September 1, 2022; 2021, ch. 355, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 31 of chapter 200, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 367, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 20 of chapter 39, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

Note.

Section 50-06-01.4 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effectt o the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 355, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1091; Section 383 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247.

Section 50-06-01.4 was amended 3 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 331, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1136; Section 3 of Chapter 332, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1117; and Section 2 of Chapter 353, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2039.

50-06-01.4.
Structure of the department. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department includes the state hospital, the regional human service centers, a vocational rehabilitation unit, health division, and other units or offices and administrative and fiscal support services as the executive director determines necessary. The department must be structured to promote efficient and effective operations and, consistent with fulfilling its prescribed statutory duties, shall act as the official agency of the state in the discharge of the following functions not otherwise by law made the responsibility of another state agency:

Administration of programs for children and families, including adoption services and the licensure of child-placing agencies, foster care services and the licensure of foster care arrangements, certification of shelter care services, child protection services, children’s trust fund, licensure of early childhood programs, refugee services, in-home community-based services, quality control, and administration of the interstate compacts on the placement of children and juveniles.

Administration of programs for individuals with developmental disabilities, including licensure of facilities and services, and the design and implementation of a community-based service system for persons in need of habilitation.

Administration of aging service programs, including nutrition, transportation, advocacy, social, ombudsman, recreation, and related services funded under the Older Americans Act of 1965 [42 U.S.C. 3001 et seq.], home and community-based services, licensure of adult foster care homes, and the committee on aging.

Administration of behavioral health programs, including:

A policy division responsible for reviewing and identifying service needs and activities in the state’s behavioral health system in an effort to ensure health and safety, access to services, and quality of services; establishing quality assurance standards for the licensure of substance use disorder program services and facilities; and providing policy leadership in partnership with public and private entities; and

A service delivery division responsible for providing chronic disease management, regional intervention services, and twenty-four-hour crisis services for individuals with behavioral health disorders.

Administration of economic assistance programs, including temporary assistance for needy families, the supplemental nutrition assistance program, home energy assistance, child care assistance, refugee assistance, work experience, work incentive, and quality control.

Administration of medical service programs, including medical assistance for children’s health insurance program, Medicaid waivers, early and periodic screening, diagnosis and treatment, utilization control, autism services, and claims processing.

Administration of general assistance.

Administration of child support.

Administration of program, services, and licensing outlined in title 23 and other previous duties of the state department of health.

The executive director shall consult with and maintain a close working relationship with the department of corrections and rehabilitation and the superintendents of the school for the deaf and the North Dakota vision services-school for the blind to develop programs for individuals with developmental disabilities; and with the superintendent of public instruction to maximize the use of resource persons in regional human service centers in the provision of special education services. The executive director shall also maintain a close liaison with human service zones.

By August 1, 2019, the department shall establish a template for the development of human service zone plans, including process and content requirements, access point expectations, client grievances procedures, human resources, and locally funded programs or services and how those services will be addressed.

The department shall develop, with assistance from the North Dakota association of counties, a process for consultation and technical assistance for human service zone working groups by August 1, 2019.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 3; 1985, ch. 311, § 11; 1985, ch. 521, § 3; 1987, ch. 570, § 18; 1989, ch. 317, § 4; 1991, ch. 508, § 3; 1991, ch. 592, § 25; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1995, ch. 458, § 2; 1997, ch. 404, § 50; 2007, ch. 39, § 20; 2013, ch. 367, § 4; 2015, ch. 200, § 31, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 331, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 332, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 353, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 79, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 352, § 383, effective September 1, 2022; 2021, ch. 355, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

50-06-01.5.
Office and office equipment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 331, § 14, effective August 1, 2017.

50-06-01.6.
Human services advisory board — Membership — Meetings — Compensation and expenses — Responsibilities. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 457, § 6.

50-06-01.7.
Behavioral health division — Administration — Fees. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The department of human services shall administratively restructure the behavioral health division to require the division to develop and revise, when necessary, the state mental health plan and provide the behavioral health division the authority to implement and supervise a unified mental health delivery system and to assure the mental health services provided by the human service centers, the state hospital, and contracted services are in accordance with the state plan.

The behavioral health division may establish nonrefundable application fees not to exceed three hundred dollars for administration and enforcement of licensing and certification activities. The department shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section. All fees collected under this section must be paid to the behavioral health division and must be used to defray the cost of administering and enforcing licensing and certification activities.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 34, § 15; 2017, ch. 332, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 393, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

50-06-01.7.
Behavioral health division — Administration — Fees. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department shall administratively restructure the behavioral health division to require the division to develop and revise, when necessary, the state mental health plan and provide the behavioral health division the authority to implement and supervise a unified mental health delivery system and to assure the mental health services provided by the human service centers, the state hospital, and contracted services are in accordance with the state plan.

The behavioral health division may establish nonrefundable application fees not to exceed three hundred dollars for administration and enforcement of licensing and certification activities. The department shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section. All fees collected under this section must be paid to the behavioral health division and must be used to defray the cost of administering and enforcing licensing and certification activities.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 34, § 15; 2017, ch. 332, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 393, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 384, effective September 1, 2022.

50-06-01.8.
Department to seek waiver to establish training, education, employment, and management program — Waiver may be terminated — Program characteristics — Cooperation with governmental bodies — Interim rulemaking. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 418, § 6.

50-06-01.9.
Criminal history record checks.

In accordance with section 12-60-24, the department may require criminal history record checks as the department determines appropriate for:

Job applicants of the department and employees of the department upon hiring;

Job applicants of the human service zone and the department’s and human service zones’ contractors and contractors’ subcontractors that may have access to federal tax information received from the United States internal revenue service through a computer match and stored in the department’s eligibility system;

A criminal history record check conducted under subsections 1 and 2 is valid for ten years, after which the department shall require another criminal history record check on employees of the department, human service zones, and the department’s and human service zones’ contractors and contractors’ subcontractors that may have access to federal tax information received from the United States internal revenue service through a computer match and stored in the department’s eligibility system;

Providers licensed by the department under chapter 50-12, as well as for any employees of those providers;

Providers holding, applicants for, and emergency designees and staff members of providers holding and applicants for early childhood services licensure, self-declaration, or in-home provider registration under chapter 50-11.1. The department also may require criminal history record checks for household members of a residence out of which early childhood services within the provider’s home are provided; and

Medicaid services applicant providers, Medicaid services providers, or an individual with a five percent or more direct or indirect ownership interest in the applicant provider or provider under chapter 50-24.1.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 422, § 2; 2017, ch. 346, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 348, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 408, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 391, § 80, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2009.

Note.

Section 50-06-01.9 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 80 of Chapter 391, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2124; and Section 1 of Chapter 408, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1115.

Section 50-06-01.9 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 348, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2090; and Section 1 of Chapter 346, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2117.

50-06-02.
Social service board — Members — Appointment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 37.

50-06-03.
Social service board — Term of office — Removal. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 37.

50-06-03.1.
Social service board members with unexpired terms. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 37.

50-06-04.
Members of board — Compensation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 486, § 37.

50-06-05.
Officers and meetings of board. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 82, § 154.

50-06-05.1.
Powers and duties of the department. [Effective through June 30, 2025]

The department has the following powers and duties to be administered by the department through its state office or regional human service centers, human service zones, or otherwise as directed by the department:

To act as the official agency of the state in any social welfare or human service activity initiated by the federal government not otherwise by law made the responsibility of another state agency.

To administer, allocate, and distribute any state and federal funds that may be made available for the purpose of providing financial assistance, care, and services to eligible persons and families who do not have sufficient income or other resources to provide a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health.

To provide preventive, rehabilitative, and other human services to help families and individuals to retain or attain capability for independence or self-care.

To do needed research and study in the causes of social problems and to define appropriate and effective techniques in providing preventive and rehabilitative services.

To provide for the study, and to promote the well-being, of a child in need of protection, a child in need of services, and delinquent children.

To provide for the placing and supervision of children in need of substitute parental care, subject to the control of any court having jurisdiction and control of any such child.

To recommend appropriate human services related legislation to the legislative assembly.

To direct and supervise human service zone activities and administer a statewide program for state-funded human services, staffing, and administration costs related to the administration of human services.

To secure, hold, and administer for the purpose for which it is established any property and any funds donated to it either by will or deed, or otherwise, or through court order or otherwise available to the department, and to administer those funds or property in accordance with the instructions in the instrument creating them or in accordance with the instructions in the court order or otherwise.

To formulate standards and make appropriate inspections and investigations in accordance with such standards in connection with all licensing activities delegated by law to the department, including early childhood programs, nonmedical adult care facilities and maternity homes, and persons or organizations receiving and placing children, and to require those facilities, persons, and organizations to submit reports and information as the department may determine necessary.

To permit the making of any surveys of human service needs and activities if determined to be necessary.

To issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and compel attendance of witnesses and production of documents or papers whenever necessary in making the investigations provided for herein or in the discharge of its other duties. A subpoena may not be issued to compel the production of documents or papers relating to any private child-caring or child-placing agency or maternity hospital or to compel the attendance as a witness of any officer or employee of those facilities except upon the order of a judge of the district court of the judicial district in which the facilities are located.

To provide insofar as staff resources permit appropriate human services, including social histories, social or social-psychological evaluations, individual, group, family, and marital counseling, and related consultation, when referred by self, parent, guardian, human service zone, court, physician, or other individual or agency, and when application is made by self (if an adult or emancipated youth), parent, guardian, or agency having custody; also, on the same basis, to provide human services to children and adults in relation to their placement in or return from the life skills and transition center, state hospital, or North Dakota youth correctional center.

To provide insofar as staff resources permit social services, including social-psychological evaluations, predisposition reports, treatment, probation, and aftercare services when requested by the judge of a juvenile court.

To provide insofar as staff resources permit social services, including social-psychological evaluations, predisposition reports, treatment, and probation and parole services, when requested by the judge in a criminal case.

To act as the official agency of the state in the administration of the supplemental nutrition assistance program and to direct and supervise human service zone administration of that program. The department with the consent of the legislative assembly or the budget section if the legislative assembly is not in session may terminate the program if the rate of federal financial participation in administrative costs provided under Public Law 93-347 is decreased or limited, or if the state or counties become financially responsible for all or a portion of the coupon bonus payments under the Food Stamp Act. Any request considered by the budget section must comply with section 54-35-02.9. The department may not deny assistance under the supplemental nutrition assistance program to any individual who has been convicted of a felony offense that has as an element the possession, use, or distribution of a controlled substance as defined in section 102(6) of the Controlled Substances Act [21 U.S.C. 802(6)].

To administer, allocate, and distribute any funds made available for the making of direct cash assistance payments, housing stabilization supports, and rental assistance and to promote cooperation and working agreements with public agencies and including the housing finance agency and department of commerce, and private human services agencies.

To act as the official agency of the state in the administration of the home energy assistance program; to direct and supervise human service zone administration of that program; and to take such actions, give such directions, and adopt such rules, subject to review in the courts of this state, as may be necessary or desirable to carry out this subsection. For purposes of the administration of the energy assistance program, funds are obligated at the earlier of the time a written commitment is made to pay a vendor or contractor for services or supplies delivered or to be delivered, or at the time payment is made to a vendor or contractor for services or supplies delivered or to be delivered. The provisions of this subsection concerning obligation of funds apply to payments and commitments made on or after July 1, 1991. The department with the consent of the legislative assembly or the budget section if the legislative assembly is not in session may terminate the program if the rate of federal financial participation in administrative costs is decreased or limited to less than fifty percent of total administrative costs, or if the state or counties become financially responsible for all or a portion of the cost of energy assistance program benefits. Any request considered by the budget section must comply with section 54-35-02.9.

To administer, allocate, and distribute any funds made available for the payment of the cost of the special needs of any child under the age of twenty-one years, who is living in an adoptive home and would probably go without adoption except for acceptance by the adopted family, and whose adopted family does not have the economic ability and resources, as established by the department, to take care of the special needs of the child, including legal fees, maintenance costs, medical and dental expenses, travel costs, and other costs incidental to the care of the child.

To exercise and carry out any other powers and duties granted the department under state law.

To administer, allocate, and distribute any funds made available for the payment of supervised independent living services, to develop standards regarding a supervised independent living program, to approve supervised independent living services for the purpose of providing foster care placement, and to apply for and administer federal and other funds that may be made available to undertake any of the activities described in this subsection.

With the approval of the governor, to lease or transfer use of any part of the life skills and transition center facilities or properties, located in section thirteen, township one hundred fifty-seven north, range fifty-three west, located in Walsh County, North Dakota, to the federal government, or any public or private agency, organization, or business enterprise, or any worthy undertaking, under the following provisions:

The department determines that the facility or property is not needed to serve any present or reasonably foreseeable need of the life skills and transition center.

The transaction is exempt from the provisions of section 50-06-06.6.

The term of any lease may not exceed ninety-nine years.

All required legal documents, papers, and instruments in any transaction must be reviewed and approved as to form and legality by the attorney general.

Any funds realized by any transaction must be deposited in the state’s general fund.

To act as a decedent’s successor for purposes of collecting amounts due to the department or human service zone, unless otherwise directed or determined by the department. Any affidavit submitted by the department under section 30.1-23-01 must conform to the requirements of that section except that the affidavit may state that twenty days have elapsed since the death of the decedent.

To provide those services necessary for the department and for human service zones to comply with the provisions of any law, rule, order, or regulation of the United States or any federal agency or authority requiring civil service or merit standards or classifications as a condition for providing funds administered by the department.

For purposes of administration of programs, and subject to legislative appropriation, funds are obligated at the time a written commitment is made to pay a vendor or contractor for services or supplies either delivered or to be delivered. This subsection applies to payments and commitments made on or after January 1, 1997.

To determine eligibility for medical assistance and children’s health insurance program benefits when the department receives a joint application for these benefits.

To develop a system of services and supports to provide behavioral health services and supports in the community for children at risk of or identified as having a behavioral health condition and for the families of these children. This system must include early intervention, treatment, and recovery services and supports and must interface with, but not include, child protective services or juvenile court.

To provide resources on mental health awareness and suicide prevention to the behavioral health resource coordinator at each public school and to the designated individual at a nonpublic school. The resources must include information on identifying warning signs, risk factors, and the availability of resources in the community, and also must include an evidence-based, online virtual mental health and suicide prevention simulation-based training program that incorporates hands-on practice, contextual learning, and personalized feedback through interactive role-playing. The provisions of chapter 54-44.4 do not apply to the online virtual mental health and suicide prevention simulation-based training program under this subsection.

To administer, allocate, and distribute any funds made available for kinship care services and payments and services in response to the federal Family First Prevention Services Act as part of the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2018 [Pub. L. 115-123].

To contract with another human service zone or any other public or private person to discharge any of the department’s duties or exercise any of the department’s powers to administer human services.

To act on behalf of the department of public instruction to administer part B, section 619 of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act [Pub. L. 108-446; 229 Stat. 2647; 20 U.S.C. 1411 et seq.].

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 466, § 5; 1975, ch. 440, § 3; 1977, ch. 450, § 1; 1981, ch. 484, § 2; 1981, ch. 486, § 21; 1983, ch. 82, § 95; 1985, ch. 522, § 1; 1987, ch. 571, § 1; 1987, ch. 582, § 30; 1989, ch. 575, § 4; 1991, ch. 328, § 8; 1991, ch. 509, § 3; 1993, ch. 2, § 15; 1993, ch. 472, § 1; 1995, ch. 34, §§ 10, 11, 14; 1995, ch. 120, § 25; 1995, ch. 457, § 3; 1995, ch. 460, § 1; 1995, ch. 461, § 6; 1997, ch. 136, § 2; 1997, ch. 403, § 9; 2005, ch. 407, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 98; 2011, ch. 54, § 8; 2013, ch. 367, § 5; 2013, ch. 226, § 1; 2017, ch. 108, § 16, effective April 21, 2017; 2017, ch. 331, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 81, effective January 1, 2020; 2019, ch. 394, §§ 1, 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 404, § 4, effective October 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 438, §§
10, 11, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 356, § 1, effective April 23, 2021; 2021, ch. 357, § 1, effective April 23, 2021; 2021, ch. 245, § 36, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 358, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 226, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 367, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 8 of chapter 54, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 98 of chapter 482, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

Note.

Section 50-06-05.1 was amended 4 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 356, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2089; Section 1 of Chapter 357, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2311; Section 3 of Chapter 358, Session Laws, 2021, House Bill 1416; and Section 36 of Chapter 245, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1035.

Section 50-06-05.1 was amended 5 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 81 of Chapter 299, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2123; Section 4 of Chapter 404, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1102; Section 10 of Chapter 438, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2055; Section 11 of Chapter 438, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2055; and Section 1 of Chapter 394, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2313.

Section 50-06-05.1 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 16 of Chapter 108, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1041; and Section 3 of Chapter 331, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1136.

Cross-References.

Establishment of regional human service centers, see § 50-06-05.3.